Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1450
Committee; statement of organization; contents, enumerated.

The statement of organization required by section 49-1449 shall include the following information:

(1) The name, street address, and telephone number, if any, of the committee. The committee address may be the home address of the candidate or treasurer of the committee;

(2) The name, street address, and telephone number, if any, of each person, other than an individual, that is a member of the committee;

(3) The full name, street address, and telephone number, if any, of the treasurer and other principal officers of the committee;

(4) The name and address of the financial institution in which the official committee depository is located, and the name and address of each financial institution in which a secondary depository is or is intended to be located;

(5) The full name of and office sought by each candidate and a brief statement identifying the substance of each ballot question supported or opposed by the committee;

(6) Identification of the committee as a candidate committee, political party committee, independent committee, or ballot question committee if it is identifiable as such a committee;

(7) If the committee is identified as a ballot question committee, a certification that no preliminary activity was directly or indirectly funded by one or more foreign nationals; and

(8) Such other information as may be required by the rules and regulations of the commission.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 50;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 50.
July 18, 2026